Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202538-2514.01
Supervision, defined.

Supervision means a collaborative process for responsible, periodic review and inspection of all aspects of occupational therapy services where (1) the occupational therapist is responsible for occupational therapy services provided by an occupational therapy assistant or an occupational therapy aide, and (2) an occupational therapy assistant is responsible for the occupational therapy services provided by the assistant. The goal of supervision is to ensure the safe and effective delivery of occupational therapy services.

Laws 2025, LB257, § 23.